Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-1803
Commissioner; adopt rules and regulations; administer act.

The commissioner shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations (1) for the safe installation, repair, maintenance, use, operation, and inspection of amusement rides as the commissioner may find necessary for the protection of the general public and (2) necessary to carry out the provisions of the Nebraska Amusement Ride Act. Such rules and regulations shall be of a reasonable nature, based upon generally accepted engineering standards, formulas, and practices, and, insofar as practicable and consistent with the Nebraska Amusement Ride Act, uniform with rules and regulations of other states. Whenever such standards are available in suitable form they may be incorporated by reference by the commissioner. The commissioner shall administer and enforce the Nebraska Amusement Ride Act and all rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to such act. The commissioner shall coordinate all regulatory and investigative activities with the appropriate state agencies.

Laws 1987, LB 226, § 3.